Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4108.01
Refund claims; interest not allowable.

For all refund claims filed on or after October 1, 1998, interest shall not be allowable on any refunds paid because of benefits earned under the Employment and Investment Growth Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1104, § 20.